Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.026

Application of chapter to individual providers under chapter 74.39A RCW.

In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this chapter applies to individual providers who have contracts with the department under chapter 74.39A RCW.

[ 2018 c 278 s 28; 2002 c 3 s 12 (Initiative Measure No. 775, approved November 6, 2001).]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2018 c 278: See note following RCW 74.39A.500.